Mississippi, session 2026, HB7.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-31-10, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 25-31-10. (1)  Any district attorney may appoint a full-time criminal investigator. (2)  The district attorneys of the Fifth, Ninth, Tenth, Eleventh, Twelfth, Thirteenth, Fourteenth, Fifteenth, Sixteenth, Seventeenth * * *, and Twentieth * * *and Twenty-second Circuit Court Districts may appoint one (1) additional full-time criminal investigator for a total of two (2) full-time criminal investigators. (3)  The district attorneys of the First, Second, Third, Fourth, Nineteenth * * *and, Twenty-first and Twenty-second Circuit Court Districts may appoint two (2) additional full-time criminal investigators for a total of three (3) full-time criminal investigators. (4)  The district attorney of the Seventh Circuit Court District may appoint one (1) additional full-time criminal investigator for a total of four (4) full-time criminal investigators. (5)  No district attorney or assistant district attorney shall accept any private employment, civil or criminal, in any matter investigated by such criminal investigators. (6)  The full and complete compensation for all public duties rendered by the criminal investigators shall be not more than Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) per annum, to be determined at the discretion of the district attorney based upon the qualifications, education and experience of the criminal investigator, plus necessary travel and other expenses, to be paid in accordance with Section 25-31-8. However, the maximum salary under this subsection for a criminal investigator who has a law degree may be supplemented by the district attorney from other available funds, but not to exceed the maximum salary for a legal assistant to a district attorney. (7)  Any criminal investigator may be designated by the district attorney to attend the Law Enforcement Officers Training Program set forth in Section 45-6-1 et seq.  The total expenses associated with attendance by criminal investigators at the Law Enforcement Officers Training Program shall be paid out of the funds of the appropriate district attorney. (8)  The district attorney shall be authorized to assign the duties of criminal investigators regardless of the source of funding for such criminal investigators. [From and after January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 25-31-10.  (1)  Any district attorney may appoint a full-time criminal investigator. (2)  The district attorneys of the Fifth, Ninth, Tenth, Eleventh, Twelfth, Thirteenth, Fourteenth, Fifteenth, Sixteenth, Seventeenth, and Twentieth Circuit Court Districts may appoint one (1) additional full-time criminal investigator for a total of two (2) full-time criminal investigators. (3)  The district attorneys of the First, Second, Third, Fourth, Nineteenth and Twenty-first Circuit Court Districts may appoint two (2) additional full-time criminal investigators for a total of three (3) full-time criminal investigators. (4)  The district attorney of the Seventh Circuit Court District may appoint one (1) additional full-time criminal investigator for a total of four (4) full-time criminal investigators. (5)  No district attorney or assistant district attorney shall accept any private employment, civil or criminal, in any matter investigated by such criminal investigators. (6)  The full and complete compensation for all public duties rendered by the criminal investigators shall be not more than Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) per annum, to be determined at the discretion of the district attorney based upon the qualifications, education and experience of the criminal investigator, plus necessary travel and other expenses, to be paid in accordance with Section 25-31-8. However, the maximum salary under this subsection for a criminal investigator who has a law degree may be supplemented by the district attorney from other available funds, but not to exceed the maximum salary for a legal assistant to a district attorney. (7)  Any criminal investigator may be designated by the district attorney to attend the Law Enforcement Officers Training Program set forth in Section 45-6-1 et seq.  The total expenses associated with attendance by criminal investigators at the Law Enforcement Officers Training Program shall be paid out of the funds of the appropriate district attorney. (8)  The district attorney shall be authorized to assign the duties of criminal investigators regardless of the source of funding for such criminal investigators. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.